Washington statutes.
RCW 43.22.435

Altering a mobile or manufactured home—Permit—Penalties—Appeals—Notice of correction.

(1)(a) In addition to or in lieu of any other penalty applicable under this chapter, and except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the department may assess a civil penalty of not more than one thousand dollars against a contractor, firm, partnership, or corporation, that fails to obtain a permit before altering a mobile or manufactured home as required under this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter. Each day on which a violation occurs constitutes a separate violation. However, the cumulative penalty for the same occurrence may not exceed five thousand dollars.

(b) The department must adopt a schedule of civil penalties giving due consideration to the appropriateness of the penalty with respect to the gravity of the violation and the history of previous violations. Penalties for subsequent violations, not constituting the same occurrence, committed within two years of a prior violation by the same party or entity, or by an individual who was a principal or officer of the same entity, must be double the amount of the penalty for the prior violation or one thousand dollars, whichever is greater.

(2)(a) The department may issue a notice of correction before issuing a civil penalty assessment. The notice must include:

(i) A description of the violation;

(ii) A statement of what is required to correct the violation;

(iii) The date by which the department requires correction to be achieved; and

(iv) Notice of the individual or department office that must be contacted to obtain a permit or other compliance information.

(b) A notice of correction is not a formal enforcement action, is not subject to appeal, and is a public record.

(c) If the department issues a notice of correction, it shall not issue a civil penalty for the violation identified in the notice of correction unless the responsible person fails to comply with the notice.

(3)(a) The department must issue written notices of civil penalties imposed under this section, with the reasons for the penalty, using a method by which the mailing can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed to the last known address of the party named in the notice.

(b) If a party desires to contest a notice of civil penalty issued under this section, the party must file a notice of appeal with the department within twenty days of the department's mailing of the notice of civil penalty. An administrative law judge of the office of administrative hearings will hear and determine the appeal. Appeal proceedings must be conducted pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. An appeal of the administrative law judge's determination or order shall be to the superior court. The superior court's decision is subject only to discretionary review under the rules of appellate procedure.

[ 2011 c 301 s 10; 2002 c 268 s 4.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Finding—Effective dates—2002 c 268: See notes following RCW 43.22.434.